tests/np-misc.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] Accusative":
    NATO<np><org><acc> : NATO'yu
    PASOK<np><org><acc> : PASOK'u
    BH<np><org><acc> : BH'yi
    Belgrad<np><top><acc> : Belgrad'ı
  

  "[lexc] Dative": 
    NATO<np><org><dat> : NATO'ya
    PASOK<np><org><dat> : PASOK'a
    BH<np><top><dat> : BH'ye
    Belgrad<np><top><acc> : Belgrad'ı
  
  "[lexc] Locative": 
    NATO<np><org><loc> : NATO'da
    PASOK<np><org><loc> : PASOK'ta
    BH<np><org><loc> : BH'de
    Belgrad<np><top><loc> : Belgrad'da    

  "[lexc] Ablative": 
    NATO<np><org><abl> : NATO'dan
    PASOK<np><org><abl> : PASOK'tan
    BH<np><top><abl> : BH'den
    Belgrad<np><top><dat> : Belgrad'dan 
